Arkansas, session 2025, HB1074.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 19-5-1103(b), concerning the Property Tax
Relief Trust Fund, is amended to read as follows:
(b) The fund shall consist of such revenues as generated by §§ 26-52-
302(c), 26-52-317(c)(1)(B), 26-52-319(a)(2)(B), 26-53-107(c), 26-53-
145(c)(1)(B), 26-53-148(a)(2)(B), and 26-56-224(c)(2). and
(c) The fund shall be used for: such purposes as set out
(1) Property tax relief; and
(2) Any other purpose authorized by the General Assembly,
subject to the requirements stated in § 26-26-310.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 26-26-310, concerning certification of the
*JLL089*
01/03/2025 8:57:40 AM JLL089

HB1074
amount of the property tax reduction and the distribution of property tax
relief funds, is amended to add an additional subsection to read as follows:
(e)(1) Except as provided in subdivision (e)(2) of this section, a
distribution from the Property Tax Relief Trust Fund under this section shall
be for the purpose of providing property tax relief.
(2) The General Assembly shall not authorize a use of the funds
in the Property Tax Relief Trust Fund for a purpose other than providing
property tax relief under this section unless the purpose is approved by a
three-fourths (3/4) vote of each house of the General Assembly.



























01/03/2025 8:57:40 AM JLL089